Utah statutes.
23-19-38.3.   Fishing licenses for disabled veterans -- Free or reduced price.

(1)  The division may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, under which a veteran with a disability may receive a fishing license free or at a reduced price.

(2)  In making rules under this section, the division shall utilize the same guidelines for disability as the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

